Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1385
Act; how construed.

The Cremation of Human Remains Act shall be construed and interpreted as a comprehensive cremation law, and the provisions of the act shall take precedence over any existing laws or rules and regulations that govern human remains that do not specifically address cremation.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 31.